Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
revolving fund for the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology
Education to be designated the "Oklahoma Workforce Education
Partnership Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund,
not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all
monies received by the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology
Education from monies appropriated or apportioned by the Legislature
and gifts, donations, and bequests. All monies accruing to the
credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
expended by the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology
Education for the purpose of expanding career technology education
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1540 Page 1

as d etermined by the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology
Education using critical occupation data. Expenditures from said
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment. The provisions of this section shall cease to have the
force and effect of law on July 1, 2030.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate




ENGR. H. B. NO. 1540 Page 2